Alabama, session 2026rs, SB265.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
28 Section 1. Sections 40-9B-3, 40-9B-4, and 40-9B-4.1,
Page 1

Section 1. Sections 40-9B-3, 40-9B-4, and 40-9B-4.1,
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
29 Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
30 "§40-9B-3
31 (a) For purposes of this chapter, the following words
32 and phrases mean:
33 (1) ABATE, ABATEMENT. A reduction or elimination of a
34 taxpayer's liability for tax or payments required to be made
35 in lieu thereof. An abatement of transaction taxes imposed
36 under Chapter 23 of this title, or payments required to be
37 made in lieu thereof, shall relieve the seller from the
38 obligation to collect and pay over the transaction tax as if
39 the sale were to a person exempt, to the extent of the
40 abatement, from the transaction tax.
41 (2) ALTERNATIVE ENERGY RESOURCES. The definition given
42 in Section 40-18-1.
43 (3) CONSTRUCTION RELATED TRANSACTION TAXES. The
44 transaction taxes imposed by Chapter 23 of this title, or
45 payments required to be made in lieu thereof, on tangible
46 personal property and taxable services incorporated into an
47 industrial development property, the cost of which may be
48 added to capital account with respect to the property,
49 determined without regard to any rule which permits
50 expenditures properly chargeable to capital account to be
51 treated as current expenses.
52 (4) DATA PROCESSING CENTER. An establishment at which
53 not less than 20 new jobs are located, the average annual
54 total compensation, including benefits, of such new jobs to be
55 not less than forty thousand dollars ($40,000) and such
56 establishment is engaged in the provision of complete
Page 2

establishment is engaged in the provision of complete
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
57 processing and specialized reports from data, the provision of
58 automated data processing and data entry services, the
59 provision of an infrastructure for hosting or data processing
60 services, the provision of specialized hosting activities, the
61 provision of application service provisioning, the provision
62 of general time-share mainframe facilities, the provision or
63 operation of computer equipment or enabling software for the
64 processing, storage, backup, retrieval, communication, or
65 distribution of data, or some combination of the foregoing,
66 without regard to whether any other activities are conducted
67 at the establishment.
68 (5) EDUCATION TAXES. Ad valorem taxes, or payments
69 required to be made in lieu thereof, that must, pursuant to
70 the Constitution of Alabama of 1901, as amended, legislative
71 act, or the resolution or other action of the governing board
72 authorizing the tax, be used for educational purposes or for
73 capital improvements for education and local construction
74 related transaction taxes levied for educational purposes or
75 for capital improvements for education.
76 (6) HEADQUARTERS FACILITY. Any trade or business
77 described in NACIS Code 551114, at which not less than 50 new
78 jobs are located.
79 (7) HYDROPOWER PRODUCTION. The definition given in
80 Section 40-18-1.
81 (8) INDUCEMENT. Refers to an agreement, or an
82 "inducement agreement," entered into between a private user
83 and a public authority or county or municipal government
84 and/or a resolution or other official action, an "inducement
Page 3

and/or a resolution or other official action, an "inducement
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
85 resolution," "inducement letter," or "official action" adopted
86 by a public authority or county or municipal government, in
87 each case expressing, among other things, the present intent
88 of such public authority or county or municipal government to
89 issue bonds in connection with the private use property
90 therein described. Notwithstanding any provision in this
91 chapter to the contrary, neither an inducement nor a request
92 for inducement shall be required to apply for, grant, or
93 receive any abatement of taxes allowed to be abated under this
94 chapter.
95 (9) INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT PROPERTY. Real and/or
96 personal property acquired in connection with establishing or
97 expanding an industrial or research enterprise in Alabama.
98 (10) INDUSTRIAL OR RESEARCH ENTERPRISE.
99 a. Any trade or business predominately consisting of
100 any one or more of the following:
101 1. Described by NAICS Code 1133, 115111, 2121, 22111,
102 221330, 31 (other than 311811), 32, 33, 423, 424, 482, 4862,
103 48691, 48699, 48819, 4882, 4883 (other than 48833), 493, 511,
104 5121 (other than 51213), 51221, 517, 518 (without regard to
105 the premise that data processing and related services be
106 performed in conjunction with a third party), 51913, 52232,
107 54133 (if predominantly in furtherance of another activity
108 described in this article), 54134 (if predominantly in
109 furtherance of another activity described in this article),
110 54138, 5415, 541614, 5417, 55 (if not for the production of
111 electricity), 561422 (other than establishments that originate
112 telephone calls), 562213, 56291, 56292, 611512, 927, or 92811.
Page 4

telephone calls), 562213, 56291, 56292, 611512, 927, or 92811.
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
113 2. A target of the state's economic development efforts
114 pursuant to either of the following:
115 (i) The Accelerate Alabama Strategic Economic
116 Development Plan adopted in January 2012 by the Alabama
117 Economic Development Alliance, created by Executive Order
118 Number 21 of the Governor on July 18, 2011, or any amended
119 version or successor document thereto; or
120 (ii) A type listed in a regulation adopted by the
121 Department of Commerce, other than a regulation submitted as
122 an emergency rule.
123 Notwithstanding the foregoing, the activities described
124 in this definition shall not predominantly concern farming
125 activities involving trees, animals or crops, nor the retail
126 sale of tangible personal property or services. This provision
127 shall not be deemed to exclude customer service centers or
128 call centers otherwise allowed or provided for herein.
129 b. With respect to abatements granted in accordance
130 with Section 40-9B-9, and only with respect to such
131 abatements, "industrial or research enterprise" means any
132 trade or business described in NAICS Code 493, 488310, or
133 488320, when such trade or business is conducted on premises
134 in which the Alabama State Port Authority has an ownership,
135 leasehold, or other possessory interest and such premises are
136 used as part of the operations of the Alabama State Port
137 Authority.
138 c. "Industrial or research enterprise" includes the
139 above-described trades and business and any others as may
140 hereafter be reclassified in any subsequent publication of the
Page 5

hereafter be reclassified in any subsequent publication of the
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
141 NAICS or similar industry classification system developed in
142 conjunction with the United States Department of Commerce or
143 Office of Management and Budget.
144 d. "Industrial or research enterprise" also includes
145 any underground natural gas storage facility which is located
146 in the Gulf Opportunity Zone, as that phrase is defined in the
147 Gulf Opportunity Zone Act of 2005, developed from existing
148 geologic reservoirs, including, without limitation, salt
149 domes, and placed in service on or before December 31, 2013.
150 e. "Industrial or research enterprise" also includes
151 any plant, property, or facility that meets both of the
152 following:
153 1. It produces electricity from:
154 (i) Alternative energy resources and has capital costs
155 of at least one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000); or
156 (ii) Hydropower production and has capital costs of at
157 least five million dollars ($5,000,000).
158 2. All or a portion of the plant, property, or facility
159 is owned by one or more of the following:
160 (i) A utility described in Section 37-4-1(7)a.,
161 (ii) An entity organized under the provisions of
162 Chapter 6 of Title 37,
163 (iii) An authority both organized and existing pursuant
164 to the provisions of Chapter 50A of Title 11 and subject to
165 the payments required to be made in lieu of ad valorem, sales,
166 use, license, and severance taxes imposed by Section 11-50A-7,
167 or
168 (iv) An entity in which one or more of the foregoing
Page 6

(iv) An entity in which one or more of the foregoing
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
169 owns an interest.
170 f. "Industrial or research enterprise" also includes
171 any headquarters facility.
172 g. "Industrial or research enterprise" also includes
173 any data processing center.
174 h. "Industrial or research enterprise" also includes
175 any research and development facility.
176 i. "Industrial or research enterprise" also includes
177 any renewable energy facility.
178 j. "Industrial or research enterprise" also includes
179 any tourism destination attraction.
180 (11) MAJOR ADDITION. Any addition to an existing
181 industrial development property that equals the lesser of: 30
182 percent of the original cost of the industrial development
183 property or two million dollars ($2,000,000). For purposes of
184 this subsection, the original cost of existing industrial
185 development property shall be the amount of industrial
186 development property with respect to which an abatement was
187 granted under this chapter when the property was constructed,
188 or if the existing industrial development property was
189 constructed before January 1, 1993, the maximum amount that
190 would have been allowed if the provisions of this chapter had
191 applied at the time it was constructed. Only property that
192 constitutes industrial development property shall be taken
193 into account in making the determination in the previous
194 sentence. Major addition shall include any addition costing at
195 least two million dollars ($2,000,000) which constitutes an
196 industrial or research enterprise, regardless of whether added
Page 7

industrial or research enterprise, regardless of whether added
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
197 to an existing industrial development property.
198 (12) MAXIMUM EXEMPTION PERIOD. Except as provided in
199 Section 40-9B-11, a period equal to the shorter of:
200 a. Either of the following:
201 1. Twenty years from and after: (i) The date of initial
202 issuance by a county, city, or public authority of bonds to
203 finance any costs of a private use property,; or (ii) If no
204 such bonds are ever issued, the later of: A. The date on which
205 title to the property was acquired by or vested in the county,
206 city, or public authority,; or B. The date on which the
207 property is or becomes owned, for federal income tax purposes,
208 by a private user; or.
209 2. Exclusively with respect to one or more private
210 users of a data processing center, the following:
211 (i) A period of 10 years from and after the date on
212 which private use property is or becomes owned, for federal
213 income tax purposes, by such private user or users (including
214 the lessor and any lessee with respect to co-location
215 centers), if the aggregate capital investment in the data
216 processing center by such private user or users does not
217 exceed two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) within 10
218 years from the date on which a private user commences the
219 acquisition, construction, and equipping of the data
220 processing center,.
221 (ii) AFor any abatement granted prior to January 1,
222 2027, a period of 20 years from and after the date on which
223 private use property is or becomes owned, for federal income
224 tax purposes, by such private user or users (including the
Page 8

tax purposes, by such private user or users (including the
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
225 lessor and any lessee with respect to co-location centers), if
226 the aggregate capital investment in the data processing center
227 by such private user or users exceeds two hundred million
228 dollars ($200,000,000) but is not greater than four hundred
229 million dollars ($400,000,000) within 10 years from the date
230 on which a private user commences the acquisition,
231 construction, and equipping of the data processing center. For
232 any abatement granted on or after January 1, 2027, a period of
233 20 years from and after the date on which the private use
234 property is or becomes owned, for federal income tax purposes,
235 by such private user or users, including the lessor or any
236 lessee with respect to co-location centers, if the aggregate
237 capital investment in the data processing center by such
238 private user or users exceeds two hundred million dollars
239 ($200,000,000) within 10 years from the date on which a
240 private user commences the acquisition, construction, and
241 equipping of the data processing center, or.
242 (iii) AFor any abatement granted until January 1, 2027,
243 a period of 30 years from and after the date on which private
244 use property is or becomes owned, for federal income tax
245 purposes, by such private user or users, (including the lessor
246 and any lessee with respect to co-location centers), if the
247 aggregate capital investment in the data processing center by
248 such private user or users exceeds two hundred million dollars
249 ($200,000,000) within 10 years from the date on which a
250 private user commences the physical work of constructing and
251 equipping the data processing center and exceeds four hundred
252 million dollars ($400,000,000) within 20 years from the date
Page 9

million dollars ($400,000,000) within 20 years from the date
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
253 on which a private user commences the acquisition,
254 construction, and equipping of the data processing center.
255 This item (iii) shall not apply to any abatement granted after
256 January 1, 2027.
257 (iv) For abatements granted on or after January 1,
258 2027, a private user or users may qualify for an additional 10
259 years of abatement, for a total maximum exemption period not
260 to exceed 30 years, if the private user or users: (1) satisfy
261 the capital investment thresholds contained in this section;
262 and (2) enter into a binding written agreement, approved by
263 the Department of Revenue, the Department of Commerce, and the
264 affected local governing body committing to provide qualified
265 local investments for the benefit of the benefited community.
266 The agreement shall describe the nature, timing, dollar value,
267 and verification procedures applicable to the qualified local
268 investments. Qualified local investments consists of:
269 A. Infrastructure improvements, including roads,
270 bridges, broadband, or other public facilities that support
271 local development;
272 B. Water or wastewater system upgrades that serve the
273 local community; or
274 C. Local education support, including capital
275 improvements, equipment, or programmatic support for public
276 K-12 schools, public charter schools, career technical
277 centers, or community college programs that serve the
278 benefited community.
279 For purposes of this item (iv), "benefited community"
280 means: (1) the county in which the project is located; (2) any
Page 10

means: (1) the county in which the project is located; (2) any
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
281 municipality located in whole or in part within that county;
282 or (3) any county or municipality adjacent to the physical
283 project site as determined by the written agreement,
284 regardless of county lines, provided such jurisdiction
285 consents in writing to receive the investment. The county and,
286 as applicable, any municipality in which the project is
287 located, by mutual written agreement with any jurisdiction
288 described in this paragraph, may designate the recipient or
289 recipients of any portion of the qualified local investments.
290 If the private user or users fail to satisfy any
291 material obligation contained in the binding agreement
292 required under this item (iv), the additional 10-year
293 abatement authorized under this item (iv) shall be revoked,
294 and the abatement shall revert to the 20-year maximum
295 exemption period otherwise applicable. Upon such revocation,
296 the private user or users shall repay all state taxes abated
297 during the extended period, together with interest as provided
298 by law.
299 For purposes of this subparagraph 2., a private user's
300 aggregate capital investment in a data processing center shall
301 include all real and personal property comprising a data
302 processing center, the costs of which may be capitalized for
303 federal income tax purposes. In no event shall abatements of
304 construction related transaction taxes or noneducational ad
305 valorem taxes granted for a data processing center apply
306 beyond the expiration of the applicable maximum exemption
307 period; or
308 b. The period ending on the date on which the property
Page 11

b. The period ending on the date on which the property
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
309 has ceased, for 6 consecutive months, to be used in the active
310 conduct of an industrial or research enterprise.
311 (13) MORTGAGE AND RECORDING TAXES. The taxes imposed by
312 Chapter 22 of this title.
313 (14) NAICS CODE. Any sector, subsector, industry group,
314 industry or national industry of the 2012 North American
315 Industry Classification System, or any similar classification
316 system developed in conjunction with the United States
317 Department of Commerce or Office of Management and Budget.
318 (15) NONEDUCATIONAL AD VALOREM TAXES. Ad valorem taxes,
319 or payments required to be made in lieu thereof, imposed by
320 the state, counties, municipalities, and other taxing
321 jurisdictions of Alabama that are not required to be used for
322 educational purposes or for capital improvements for
323 education.
324 (16) PERSON. Includes any individual, partnership,
325 trust, estate, or corporation.
326 (17) PRIVATE USER. Any individual, partnership, or
327 corporation organized for profit that is or will be treated as
328 the owner of private use property for federal income tax
329 purposes, any entity organized under Chapter 6 of Title 37,
330 and any authority both organized and existing pursuant to
331 Chapter 50A of Title 11 and subject to the payments required
332 to be made in lieu of ad valorem, sales, use, license, and
333 severance taxes imposed by Section 11-50A-7.
334 (18) PRIVATE USE INDUSTRIAL PROPERTY. Private use
335 property that also constitutes industrial development
336 property.
Page 12

property.
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
337 (19) PRIVATE USE PROPERTY. Any real and/or personal
338 property which is or will be treated as owned by a private
339 user for federal income tax purposes even though title may be
340 held by a public authority or municipal or county government;
341 any real and/or personal property which is owned by any entity
342 organized under Chapter 6 of Title 37; and any real and/or
343 personal property which is owned by any authority both
344 organized and existing pursuant to Chapter 50A of Title 11,
345 and subject to the payments required to be made in lieu of ad
346 valorem, sales, use, license, and severance taxes imposed by
347 Section 11-50A-7.
348 (20) PUBLIC AUTHORITY. A corporation created for public
349 purposes pursuant to a provision of the Constitution of
350 Alabama of 1901, or a general or local law that authorized it
351 to issue bonds, the interest on which is exempt from the
352 Alabama income tax, as in effect on May 21, 1992.
353 (21) PUBLIC INDUSTRIAL AUTHORITY. A public authority
354 authorized to issue bonds to acquire, construct, equip, or
355 finance industrial development property.
356 (22) RENEWABLE ENERGY FACILITY. Any plant, property, or
357 facility that either:
358 a. Produces electricity or natural gas, in whole or in
359 part, from biofuels as such term is defined in Section
360 2-2-90(c)(2) or from renewable energy resources as such term
361 is defined in Section 40-18-1(30) with the exception that
362 hydropower production shall be excluded from such definition;
363 or
364 b. Produces biofuel as such term is defined in Section
Page 13

b. Produces biofuel as such term is defined in Section
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
365 2-2-90(c)(2).
366 (23) RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT FACILITY. An
367 establishment engaged in conducting original investigations
368 undertaken on a systematic basis to gain new knowledge or
369 applying research findings or other scientific knowledge to
370 create new or significantly improved products or processes, or
371 both.
372 (24) STATEMENT OF INTENT. A written statement of intent
373 to claim an abatement provided in this chapter, or to petition
374 for local tax abatement, relating to an industrial or research
375 enterprise described in paragraph e. of subdivision (10) of
376 this subsection that is filed with the Department of Revenue
377 at any time prior to the date on which the industrial or
378 research enterprise described in paragraph e. of subdivision
379 (10) of this subsection is placed in service in accordance
380 with such procedures and on such form or forms as may be
381 prescribed by the Department of Revenue. Such statement of
382 intent shall contain a description of the industrial or
383 research enterprise described in paragraph e. of subdivision
384 (10) of this subsection; the date on which the acquisition,
385 construction, installation, or equipping of the industrial or
386 research enterprise described in paragraph e. of subdivision
387 (10) of this subsection was commenced or is expected to
388 commence; the actual or, if not known, the estimated capital
389 costs of the industrial or research enterprise described in
390 paragraph e. of subdivision (10) of this subsection; the
391 number of new employees to be employed at the industrial or
392 research enterprise described in paragraph e. of subdivision
Page 14

research enterprise described in paragraph e. of subdivision
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
393 (10) of this subsection; and any other information required by
394 the Department of Revenue.
395 (25) TOURISM DESTINATION ATTRACTION. A commercial
396 enterprise which is open to the public not less than 120 days
397 during a calendar year and is designed to attract visitors
398 from inside or outside of the State of Alabama, typically for
399 its inherent cultural value, historical significance, natural
400 or man-made beauty, or entertainment or amusement
401 opportunities. The term shall include, but not be limited to,
402 a cultural or historical site; a botanical garden; a museum; a
403 wildlife park or aquarium open to the public that cares for
404 and displays a collection of animals or fish; an amusement
405 park; a convention hotel and conference center; a water park;
406 or a spectator venue or arena.
407 A tourism destination attraction shall not include a
408 facility primarily devoted to the retail sale of goods; a
409 shopping center; a restaurant; a movie theater; a bowling
410 alley; a fitness center; a miniature golf course; or a
411 nightclub. Provided, however, that the capital costs of the
412 construction of a tourism destination attraction may include
413 the capital costs associated with the construction of any
414 retail establishment, restaurant or other portion of the
415 tourism destination attraction. The term also does not include
416 any gaming facility or establishment that the Secretary of the
417 Department of Commerce deems to be serving the local
418 community.
419 (b) The abatements of ad valorem taxes, and payments in
420 lieu thereof, allowed by amendments to this section by Act
Page 15

lieu thereof, allowed by amendments to this section by Act
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
421 2008-275 shall become effective for projects for which
422 statements of intent are filed after December 31, 2011. No ad
423 valorem taxes, or payments in lieu thereof, shall be abated
424 for periods prior to January 1, 2012. The other abatements
425 allowed by amendments made to this section by Act 2008-275
426 shall become effective after December 31, 2011.
427 For a qualifying industrial or research enterprise
428 described in Section 40-9B-3(a)(10)j., the approval of the
429 abatement of a specified ad valorem tax or construction
430 related tax levied or imposed by a county or municipality, or
431 payments required to be made in lieu thereof, shall take
432 effect only upon adoption of a resolution by the governing
433 body of that county or municipality approving such abatement
434 or abatements."
435 "§40-9B-4
436 (a) Noneducational ad valorem taxes, construction
437 related transaction taxes, except those local construction
438 related transaction taxes levied for educational purposes or
439 for capital improvements for education, and mortgage and
440 recording taxes, or payments required to be made in lieu
441 thereof, and in the case of a qualifying industrial or
442 research enterprise described in Section 40-9B-3(a)(10)e.
443 which is owned by an entity organized under Chapter 6 of Title
444 37, or by an authority both organized and existing pursuant to
445 Chapter 50A of Title 11, and subject to the payments required
446 to be made in lieu of ad valorem, sales, use, license, and
447 severance taxes imposed by Section 11-50A-7, in addition to
448 the foregoing, all other ad valorem taxes, or payments
Page 16

the foregoing, all other ad valorem taxes, or payments
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
449 required to be made in lieu thereof, imposed by the state,
450 counties, municipalities, and other taxing jurisdictions of
451 Alabama, may be abated with respect to private use industrial
452 property and security documents and other recordable documents
453 associated therewith as provided in this chapter.
454 (b)(1) No abatement of noneducational ad valorem taxes,
455 other ad valorem taxes, or payments required to be made in
456 lieu of the foregoing, may exceed the maximum exemption
457 period. No further abatement with respect to the same private
458 use industrial property may be granted unless there is a major
459 addition to the property, in which event abatement may be
460 granted only with respect to the noneducational ad valorem
461 taxes, and in the case of a qualifying industrial or research
462 enterprise described in Section 40-9B-3(a)(10)e. which is
463 owned by an entity organized under Chapter 6 of Title 37, or
464 by an authority both organized and existing pursuant to
465 Chapter 50A of Title 11, and subject to the payments required
466 to be made in lieu of ad valorem, sales, use, license, and
467 severance taxes imposed by Section 11-50A-7, in addition to
468 the noneducational ad valorem taxes, with respect to all other
469 ad valorem taxes, or payments required to be made in lieu
470 thereof, imposed by the state, counties, municipalities, and
471 other taxing jurisdictions of Alabama, on the major addition
472 by complying with the procedures set forth in this chapter.
473 Notwithstanding the immediately preceding sentence, with
474 respect to a data processing center, an abatement of
475 noneducational ad valorem taxes, other ad valorem taxes, or
476 payments required to be made in lieu thereof, shall apply to
Page 17

payments required to be made in lieu thereof, shall apply to
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
477 all real and personal property comprising a data processing
478 center, the costs of which may be capitalized for federal
479 income tax purposes, acquired at any time during the
480 applicable maximum exemption period, including, but not
481 limited to, computers, software licensed for use at the
482 qualifying data processing center, equipment supporting
483 computing, networking, or data storage; cooling systems,
484 cooling towers, and other temperature infrastructure; power
485 infrastructure for transformation, distribution, or management
486 of electricity used for the maintenance and operation of a
487 data processing center, including, but not limited to,
488 exterior dedicated business-owned substations, backup power
489 generation systems, battery systems, and related
490 infrastructure; and any other equipment necessary for the
491 maintenance and operation of a data processing center.
492 (2) Effective for an abatement granted: (i) on or
493 after January 1, 2027; and (ii) to a data processing center
494 with a total peak demand of 100 megawatts or greater, no
495 abatement of state noneducational ad valorem taxes shall
496 extend beyond the date the private use industrial property is
497 placed in service.
498 (c)(1) An abatement of construction related transaction
499 taxes, or payments required to be made in lieu thereof, shall
500 apply only to tangible personal property and taxable services
501 incorporated into a private use industrial property, the cost
502 of which may be added to capital account with respect to the
503 property, determined without regard to any rule which permits
504 expenditures properly chargeable to capital account to be
Page 18

expenditures properly chargeable to capital account to be
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
505 treated as current expenses. No abatement of construction
506 related transaction taxes, or payments required to be made in
507 lieu thereof, shall extend beyond the date the private use
508 industrial property is placed in service; provided, however,
509 that an abatement of construction related transaction taxes,
510 or payments required to be made in lieu thereof, for a data
511 processing center shall apply to all taxable services and
512 acquisitions of real and personal property comprising the data
513 processing center, the costs of which may be capitalized for
514 federal income tax purposes, occurring at any time during the
515 applicable maximum exemption period, including, but not
516 limited to, computers, software licensed for use at the
517 qualifying data processing center, equipment supporting
518 computing, networking, or data storage; cooling systems,
519 cooling towers, and other temperature infrastructure; power
520 infrastructure for transformation, distribution, or management
521 of electricity used for the maintenance and operation of a
522 data processing center, including, but not limited to,
523 exterior dedicated business-owned substations, backup power
524 generation systems, battery systems, and related
525 infrastructure; and any other equipment necessary for the
526 maintenance and operation of a data processing center. No
527 further abatement may be granted for construction related
528 transaction taxes, or payments required to be made in lieu
529 thereof, with respect to the private use industrial property
530 unless incurred in connection with a major addition, in which
531 event only construction related transaction taxes, or payments
532 required to be made in lieu thereof, that may be added to
Page 19

required to be made in lieu thereof, that may be added to
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
533 capital account with respect to the major addition, determined
534 without regard to any rule which permits expenditures properly
535 chargeable to capital account to be treated as current
536 expenses, may be abated by complying with the procedures set
537 forth in Act 92-599 as amended, and as amended by Act
538 2008-275. Except in the case of a qualifying industrial or
539 research enterprise described in Section 40-9B-3(a)(10)e.
540 which is owned by an entity organized under Chapter 6 of Title
541 37, or by an authority both organized and existing pursuant to
542 Chapter 50A of Title 11, and subject to the payments required
543 to be made in lieu of ad valorem, sales, use, license, and
544 severance taxes imposed by Section 11-50A-7, no local
545 construction related transaction taxes levied for educational
546 purposes or capital improvements for education, or payments
547 required to be made in lieu thereof, may be abated.
548 (2) a. Effective for an abatement granted: (i) on or
549 after January 1, 2027; and (ii) to a data processing center
550 with a total peak demand of 100 megawatts or greater,
551 construction related transaction taxes levied pursuant to
552 Chapter 23 of this title, or payments required to be made in
553 lieu thereof, on computers, servers, software licensed for use
554 at the data processing center, equipment supporting computing,
555 networking, or data storage, cooling systems, cooling towers,
556 and other temperature infrastructure, and any other equipment
557 necessary for the maintenance and operation of a data
558 processing center, shall be eligible for abatement throughout
559 the applicable maximum exemption period as provided in (c)
560 (1).
Page 20

(1).
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
561 b. Except for those provided in (2) a., effective for
562 an abatement granted: (i) on or after January 1, 2027; and
563 (ii) to a data processing center with a total peak demand of
564 100 megawatts or greater, no abatement of state construction
565 related transaction taxes levied pursuant to Chapter 23 of
566 this title, or payments required to be made in lieu thereof,
567 shall extend beyond the date the private use industrial
568 property is placed in service.
569 (3) Notwithstanding subdivision (c)(2), the Governor
570 may abate the state construction related transaction taxes for
571 the maximum exemption period for a data processing center with
572 a total peak demand of 100 megawatts or greater, if the data
573 processing center is located in a "targeted county" as defined
574 in Section 40-18-376.1.
575 (d) Mortgage and recording taxes with respect to
576 mortgages, deeds, and documents relating to issuing or
577 securing obligations and conveying title into or out of the
578 public authority or county or municipal government with
579 respect to a private use industrial property may be abated by
580 complying with the procedures set forth in this chapter.
581 (e) An abatement under this section may be granted only
582 with respect to private use industrial property that has not
583 previously been placed in service by the private user who is
584 applying for the abatement or by a person who is a related
585 party, as defined in 26 U.S.C. §267, with respect to such
586 private user.
587 (f)(1) For a qualifying industrial or research
588 enterprise described in Section 40-9B-3(a)(10)e., which is
Page 21

enterprise described in Section 40-9B-3(a)(10)e., which is
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
589 owned by a utility described in Section 37-4-1(7)a., and which
590 is a coal gasification or liquefaction project or an advanced
591 fossil-based generation project, as such terms are defined in
592 Section 40-18-1, or which utilizes hydropower production, an
593 abatement under this section shall be in an amount equal to
594 100 percent of the state noneducational ad valorem taxes owed
595 for plant, property, and facilities for the maximum exemption
596 period, and in an amount equal to 50 percent of the state
597 construction related transaction taxes. The abatement shall
598 not be subject to the procedures in Section 40-9B-5 or
599 40-9B-6.
600 (2) For a qualifying industrial or research enterprise
601 described in Section 40-9B-3(a)(10)e., which is owned by a
602 utility described in Section 37-4-1(7)a., and which is a
603 project using an alternative energy resource the abatements
604 for which are not provided in subdivision (1), an abatement
605 under this section shall be in an amount equal to 100 percent
606 of the state noneducational ad valorem taxes owed for plant,
607 property, and facilities for the maximum exemption period, and
608 in an amount equal to 50 percent of the state construction
609 related transaction taxes. The abatement shall not be subject
610 to the procedures in Section 40-9B-5 or 40-9B-6.
611 (3) For a qualifying industrial or research enterprise
612 described in Section 40-9B-3(a)(10)e., which is owned by an
613 entity organized under Chapter 6 of Title 37, an abatement
614 under this section shall be in an amount equal to 100 percent
615 of the ad valorem taxes owed for plant, property, and
616 facilities for the maximum exemption period, and in an amount
Page 22

facilities for the maximum exemption period, and in an amount
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
617 equal to 100 percent of the construction related transaction
618 taxes. An abatement of ad valorem taxes levied or imposed by
619 counties or municipalities may be granted as provided in
620 subsection (h). An abatement of the construction related
621 transaction taxes imposed by the governing body of a county
622 pursuant to authority conferred under Article 1 of Chapter 12
623 of Title 40, or any general, special, or local act of the
624 Legislature, and such transaction taxes imposed by the
625 governing body of a municipality pursuant to authority
626 conferred under Article 3 of Chapter 51 of Title 11, or any
627 general, special, or local act of the Legislature, and all
628 transaction taxes imposed by any other local taxing
629 jurisdiction of Alabama may be granted as provided in
630 subsection (h). The abatement shall not be subject to the
631 procedures in Section 40-9B-5 or 40-9B-6.
632 (4) For a qualifying industrial or research enterprise
633 described in Section 40-9B-3(a)(10)e., which is owned by an
634 authority both organized and existing pursuant to Chapter 50A
635 of Title 11, and subject to the payments required to be made
636 in lieu of ad valorem, sales, use, license, and severance
637 taxes imposed by Section 11-50A-7, an abatement under this
638 section against the payments required to be made in lieu of
639 taxes imposed by Section 11-50A-7, shall be allowed in an
640 amount equal to 100 percent of the payments required to be
641 made in lieu of ad valorem taxes owed for plant, property, and
642 facilities for the maximum exemption period, and in an amount
643 equal to 100 percent of the payments required to be made in
644 lieu of the construction related transaction taxes, including,
Page 23

lieu of the construction related transaction taxes, including,
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
645 without limitation, payments required to be made in lieu of
646 all transaction taxes imposed by the governing body of a
647 county pursuant to authority conferred under Article 1 of
648 Chapter 12 of this title, or any general, special, or local
649 act of the Legislature, all transaction taxes imposed by the
650 governing body of a municipality pursuant to authority
651 conferred under Article 3 of Chapter 51 of Title 11, or any
652 general, special, or local act of the Legislature, and
653 payments required to be made in lieu of all transaction taxes
654 imposed by any other taxing jurisdiction of Alabama. The
655 abatement of such payments required to be made in lieu of
656 local taxes may be granted as provided in subsection (h). The
657 abatement shall not be subject to the procedures in Section
658 40-9B-5 or 40-9B-6.
659 (5) For a qualifying industrial or research enterprise
660 described in Section 40-9B-3(a)(10)e., which is owned by a
661 utility described in Section 37-4-1(7)a., the abatement for
662 state noneducational ad valorem taxes provided in subdivision
663 (1) or (2) of this subsection, shall be equal to 100 percent
664 of the state noneducational ad valorem taxes owed for plant,
665 property, and facilities for the maximum exemption period if
666 the industrial or research enterprise is located in either of
667 the following:
668 a. Any area designated or created as an enterprise zone
669 by law or that is governed by the Alabama Enterprise Zone Act.
670 b. 1. Any Alabama county which is considered to be less
671 developed. A county is considered to be less developed if it
672 has been found to be less developed by the Alabama Department
Page 24

has been found to be less developed by the Alabama Department
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
673 of Labor using the most current data available from the United
674 States Departments of Labor or Commerce, the United States
675 Bureau of the Census, or any other federal or state agency,
676 and which finding shall be made not later than January 1 of
677 each year thereafter.
678 2. A county shall be found to be less developed if it
679 is ranked as the forty-fifth through sixty-seventh county,
680 inclusive, using the following factors:
681 (i) Percent change in population over the most recent
682 five-year period.
683 (ii) Personal per capita income in the last calendar
684 year for which data are available.
685 (iii) The average percent employed over the last 12
686 months for which data are available.
687 3. The factors used in ranking counties shall be
688 weighted in the following manner:
689 (i) Percent change in population (25 percent).
690 (ii) Personal per capita income (25 percent).
691 (iii) Average percent employed (50 percent).
692 (6) a. To the extent that a plant, property, or
693 facility described in Section 40-9B-3(a)(10)e., is owned in
694 whole or in part by one or more private users listed
695 hereinafter in subparagraphparagraph c., including, but not
696 limited to, ownership as tenants in common, joint tenants, or
697 owners of an undivided interest, then each private user shall
698 be entitled to the abatement allowed under this section with a
699 percentage limitation equal to the ownership interest
700 percentage of the private user multiplied by the percentage
Page 25

percentage of the private user multiplied by the percentage
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
701 limitation found in this subsection applicable to the private
702 user for the tax, or payment in lieu of tax, in question.
703 b. To the extent that a plant, property, or facility
704 described in Section 40-9B-3(a)(10)e. is owned by a private
705 user which is itself owned in whole or in part by one or more
706 of the entities listed hereinafter in subparagraphparagraph
707 c., then the private user shall be entitled to the abatement
708 allowed under this section with a percentage limitation equal
709 to the sum, for all owners, of the ownership interest
710 percentage of each owner multiplied by the percentage
711 limitation found in this subsection applicable to the owner
712 for the tax, or payment in lieu of tax, in question.
713 c. The entities listed in this subparagraphparagraph c.
714 are:
715 1. A utility described in Section 37-4-1(7)a.;
716 2. An entity organized under Chapter 6 of Title 37.;
717 and
718 3. An authority both organized and existing pursuant to
719 Chapter 50A of Title 11 and subject to the payments required
720 to be made in lieu of ad valorem, sales, use, license, and
721 severance taxes imposed by Section 11-50A-7.
722 (7) No abatement for mortgage and recording taxes,
723 local noneducational ad valorem taxes, or local noneducational
724 construction related transaction taxes shall be granted to a
725 qualifying industrial or research enterprise described in
726 Section 40-9B-3(a)(10)e., owned by a utility described in
727 Section 37-4-1(7)a., except upon the approval of the abatement
728 by the governing body of the county or municipality as
Page 26

by the governing body of the county or municipality as
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
729 provided in subsection (b) of Section 40-9B-5(b).
730 (g) The abatements of ad valorem taxes and payments in
731 lieu thereof allowed by amendments to this section by Act
732 2008-275 shall become effective for projects for which
733 statements of intent are filed after December 31, 2011. No ad
734 valorem taxes, or payments in lieu thereof, shall be abated
735 for periods prior to January 1, 2012. The other abatements
736 allowed by amendments made to this section by Act 2008-275
737 shall become effective after December 31, 2011.
738 (h) For a qualifying industrial or research enterprise
739 described in Section 40-9B-3(a)(10)e., the approval of the
740 abatement of a specific ad valorem tax or construction related
741 tax levied or imposed by a county or municipality, or payments
742 required to be made in lieu thereof, shall take effect only
743 upon adoption of a resolution by the governing body of that
744 county or municipality approving such abatement or
745 abatements."
746 "§40-9B-4.1
747 In no event shall any incentive provided in Act
748 2012-210 be available to any company filing an application
749 after July 31, 20282032. Any project granted an incentive
750 prior to July 31, 20282032, shall be entitled to the incentive
751 pursuant to the project agreement regardless of whether Act
752 2012-210 is reauthorized."
753 "§40-23-35
754 (a) Such amount of money as shall be appropriated for
755 each fiscal year by the Legislature to the Department of
756 Revenue with which to pay the salaries, the cost of operation
Page 27

Revenue with which to pay the salaries, the cost of operation
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
757 and management of the department shall be deducted, as a first
758 charge thereon, from the taxes collected under the provisions
759 of this division; provided, that the expenditure of the sum so
760 appropriated shall be budgeted and allotted pursuant to
761 Article 4 of Chapter 4 of Title 41, and limited to the amount
762 appropriated to defray the expenses of operating the
763 department for each fiscal year. After the payment of the
764 expenses, so much of the amount remaining as may be necessary,
765 after first applying all sums of money received by reason of
766 the application of the surplus in the income tax as provided
767 by Section 40-18-58, for the replacement in the public school
768 fund of the three-mill constitutional levy for schools and in
769 the General Fund of the one-mill levy for soldiers' relief and
770 the two and one-half mills for general purposes lost by
771 exemption of homestead provided for in this division shall be
772 first charges against the proceeds of the licenses, taxes, or
773 receipts levied or collected under this division. The
774 Comptroller, with the approval of the Governor, is hereby
775 directed to draw his or her warrants payable out of the total
776 proceeds of the licenses, taxes, or receipts levied or
777 collected under this division as herein provided in such sum
778 as shall be found necessary to take care of and replace the
779 three-mill constitutional school levy, the one-mill soldiers'
780 relief levy, and the two and one-half mill levy for general
781 purposes of the state ad valorem taxes lost as above set
782 forth.
783 (b) Of the amounts of such collections in any fiscal
784 year remaining after the payment of the expenses of
Page 28

year remaining after the payment of the expenses of
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
785 administration and replacement of the amounts in the several
786 funds as herein provided there shall be paid into the Treasury
787 sums to be credited as follows:
788 (1) To the credit of the 67 counties of the state, to
789 be divided and distributed as hereinafter provided, three
790 hundred seventy-eight thousand dollars ($378,000);
791 (2) To the Department of Human Resources, one million
792 three hundred twenty-two thousand dollars ($1,322,000); and
793 (3) Beginning June 1, 2000, to the Department of
794 Conservation and Natural Resources for capital outlay for
795 acquisition of land contiguous to existing state parks and
796 land acquired for lakes and or water reservoirs, provision,
797 construction, improvement, renovation, equipping, and
798 maintenance of the state parks system only and not for use by
799 the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources for
800 personnel or administrative use, the sum equal to the increase
801 in receipts accruing to the State of Alabama due to the cap on
802 discounts per license holder in Section 40-23-36(b), which
803 increase shall be equal to the difference between the discount
804 rate or amount allowed under Section 40-23-36(b) and the
805 maximum discount rate allowable under Section 40-23-36(a);
806 provided, however, if at any time any bonds of the Alabama
807 State Parks System Improvement Corporation, or the Alabama
808 Public Historical Sites and Parks Improvement Corporation, are
809 outstanding (excluding bonds that have been refunded by the
810 establishment of an escrow trust for the payment thereof
811 consisting solely of bonds or other obligations which as to
812 principal and interest constitute direct obligations of, or
Page 29

principal and interest constitute direct obligations of, or
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
813 are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of
814 America) there shall first be paid into the State General Fund
815 from such collections an amount equal to the debt service
816 (principal, interest, and premium, if any) payable on such
817 bonds in the then current fiscal year of the state. Provided,
818 however, that one million dollars ($1,000,000) of such
819 increase in receipts per fiscal year shall be credited to the
820 Department of Human Resources beginning October 1, 1996, until
821 September 30, 2002, and shall be expended for the foster
822 children program.
823 (4)a. On October 1, 2002, to the Department of
824 Conservation and Natural Resources for capital outlay, repairs
825 and maintenance of the state parks system only, the minimum
826 sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) from the increase in
827 receipts accruing to the State of Alabama due to the cap on
828 discounts per license holder in Section 40-23-36(b) as
829 calculated in Section 40-23-35(b)(3). Beginning October 1,
830 2003, through September 30, 2021, annually, to the Department
831 of Conservation and Natural Resources for capital outlay,
832 repairs, and maintenance of the state parks system only, the
833 sum calculated by a fraction, the numerator of which is five
834 million dollars ($5,000,000) and the denominator of which is
835 equal to the increase in receipts as calculated in Section
836 40-23-35(b)(3) for fiscal year 2002 accruing to the State of
837 Alabama multiplied by the increase in receipts as calculated
838 in Section 40-23-35(b)(3) for the then current fiscal year, or
839 the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000), whichever is
840 greater. Notwithstanding the previous sentence, for the fiscal
Page 30

greater. Notwithstanding the previous sentence, for the fiscal
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
841 years ending September 30, 2012, and September 30, 2013, only,
842 the five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be transferred to
843 the State General Fund.
844 b. Beginning October 1, 2021, annually, to the
845 Department of Conservation and Natural Resources for capital
846 outlay, repairs, and maintenance of the state parks system
847 only, seven million dollars ($7,000,000). Beginning with the
848 fiscal year that starts October 1, 2022, the State Treasurer
849 shall annually adjust the dollar amount in this paragraph to
850 reflect the cumulative change in the Consumer Price Index for
851 All Urban Consumers (CPI-U), as published by the Bureau of
852 Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor, or
853 a successor index, for the annual period ending on the
854 December 31 preceding the adjustment date and rounded to the
855 nearest one thousand dollars ($1,000).
856 c. Beginning October 1, 2002, to the credit of the
857 State General Fund, the balance of the sum equal to the
858 increase in receipts accruing to the State of Alabama due to
859 the cap on discounts per license holder in Section
860 40-23-36(b).
861 (c) One-half of the amount deposited to the credit of
862 the 67 counties as above provided, shall be divided and
863 distributed proportionately among the 67 counties of the state
864 according to the population of the counties as shown by the
865 last federal census as proclaimed, published, or certified by
866 the Director of the Bureau of the Census; and one-half of the
867 proceeds shall be divided or distributed equally among 67
868 counties; provided, that the funds divided and distributed to
Page 31

counties; provided, that the funds divided and distributed to
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
869 the several counties of the state as hereinabove provided for
870 shall be used exclusively for full-time health service in
871 cooperation with the State Board of Health or the federal
872 government, and for extension services in cooperation with the
873 Alabama Agriculture Extension Service or the federal
874 government, at the discretion of the county commissions of the
875 several counties of the state.
876 (d) The amounts provided in subsection (b) for the
877 Department of Human Resources shall be used for general
878 welfare purposes. For purposes of this division, "general
879 welfare purposes" means:
880 (1) The administration of public assistance as set out
881 in Sections 38-2-5 and 38-4-1;
882 (2) Services, including supplementation and
883 supplementary services under the federal Social Security Act,
884 to or on behalf of persons to whom such public assistance may
885 be given under Section 38-4-1;
886 (3) Services to and on behalf of dependent, neglected,
887 or delinquent children; and
888 (4) Investigative and referral services to and on
889 behalf of needy persons.
890 (e) In addition, there shall be paid, commencing on
891 January 1, 1978, and on the first day of each fiscal quarter
892 thereafter, to the Department of Human Resources for a
893 statewide, state-administered food stamp program, as
894 authorized by the Food Stamp Act of 1964, Public Law 88-525,
895 88th Congress, and amendments thereto, an amount equal to five
896 percent of the value of food stamp benefits issued statewide
Page 32

percent of the value of food stamp benefits issued statewide
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
897 in excess of the amount paid by recipients (bonus or free
898 stamps) during the immediate prior fiscal quarter, which sum
899 so appropriated shall be paid quarterly to the Department of
900 Human Resources Trust Fund for administration of the food
901 stamp program in conformity with rules and regulations
902 promulgatedadopted by the United States Department of
903 Agriculture and in conformity with Sections 38-1-1 through
904 38-6-9. The administrative funds shall be limited to and based
905 on fiscal year 1976-77 administrative costs, normal
906 inflationary increases, and mandated administration
907 requirements of the Alabama Legislature and the United States
908 Department of Agriculture. The Department of Human Resources
909 will not staff any county food stamp office at a level that
910 exceeds the average staff-to-recipient ratios that existed in
911 Alabama during fiscal year 1976-77. This restriction will
912 apply in coordination with those provided hereinabove and,
913 should conflict occur, the lesser amount of expenditure shall
914 be required. At the end of each fiscal year, an accounting
915 shall be made of the sum so that any unexpended and
916 unencumbered balance of funds may be determined for the
917 purpose of paying such balance to the Education Trust Fund.
918 (f) The amount of the proceeds of all taxes levied by
919 this division remaining after the payment of the expenses of
920 administration and enforcement and the replacement in the
921 several funds of the amount lost by any homestead exemptions
922 and the distribution as provided in subsections (b) and (d),
923 shall be paid into the Education Trust Fund except as provided
924 in subdivision (4) of Section 40-23-2(4) and subsection (c) of
Page 33

in subdivision (4) of Section 40-23-2(4) and subsection (c) of
SLUET57-1 03/18/2026 KHF (H) HSE 2026-671
925 Section 40-23-61(c) and, beginning January 1, 2016, except
926 those collected on consumable vapor products as defined in
927 subdivision (15) of subsection (a) of Section 40-23-1(a)(15),
928 and, beginning January 1, 2027, those collected on
929 construction related transaction taxes on building materials,
930 building fixtures, structural components, real property
931 improvements, power infrastructure for transformation,
932 distribution, or management of electricity, backup power
933 generation systems, and battery systems for data processing
934 centers under Section 40-9B-4(c)(2), which shall be
935 distributed to the State General Fund."
936 Section 2. Nothing in this act amending Sections
937 40-9B-3, 40-9B-4, and 40-9B-4.1 Code of Alabama 1975, shall
938 apply to any incentive that is part of a project executed
939 before the effective date of this act or expansions of that
940 project after the effective date of this act for a 10-year
941 period after the effective date of this act.
942 Section 3. This act shall become effective on June 1,
943 2026.
Page 34